North Carolina statutes. Chapter 121. Archives and History.
Article 1. General Provisions.
§ 121-7.7.
State Historic Sites and Museums special fund.

Fund. — The State Historic Sites and Museums Fund is created as a special, interest-bearing revenue fund in the Division of State Historic Sites and the Division of State History Museums. The Fund consists of all receipts derived from the lease or rental of property or facilities, disposition of structures or products of the land, donations, gifts, devises, and admissions and fees collected at the State Historic Sites, State History Museums, and Maritime Museums. The Fund also consists of the net proceeds derived from the sale of real property pursuant to G.S. 146-30(d)(11). The revenues in the Fund may be used only for the operation, interpretation, maintenance, preservation, development, and expansion of the individual State Historic Site, State History Museum, and Maritime Museum where the receipts are generated. The respective Division and the staff from each State Historic Site, State History Museum, and Maritime Museum shall determine how the funds shall be used at that Historic Site, State History Museum, and Maritime Museum.

Application. — This section applies to the individual State Historic Sites and State History and Maritime Museums owned by or under the control of the Division of State Historic Sites and the Division of State History Museums, with the exception of the Bentonville Battlefield State Historic Site and the North Carolina Transportation Museum. The Bentonville Battlefield State Historic Site is subject to

G.S. 121-7.5

. The North Carolina Transportation Museum is subject to

G.S. 121-7.6

.

Reports. — The Department of Natural and Cultural Resources must submit to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources, the chairs of the House of Representatives Appropriations Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources, the chairs of the Senate Appropriations Committee on Natural and Economic Resources, and the Fiscal Research Division by September 30 of each year a report on the Fund that includes the source and amounts of all funds credited to the Fund and the purpose and amount of all expenditures from the Fund during the prior fiscal year.

History.

2011-213, s. 1; 2012-142, s. 18.2; 2015-241, s. 14.30(uu); 2017-57, ss. 14.1(dd), 14.3(c); 2021-180, s. 14.1(b).

Cross References.

As to food service at museums and historic sites operated by the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources, see

G.S. 111-47.2

.

§ 121-8.
Historic preservation program.

Historic Preservation Agency Designated. — The historic preservation agency of the State of North Carolina shall be the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources.

Surveys of Historic Properties. — The Department of Natural and Cultural Resources shall conduct a continuing statewide survey to identify, document, and record properties having historical, architectural, archaeological, or other cultural significance to the State, its communities, and the nation. Upon approval of the North Carolina Historical Commission, the Deputy Secretary of Archives and History or his designee as the State Historic Preservation Officer, may nominate appropriate properties for entry in the National Register of Historic Places as established by the National Historic Preservation Act of 1966, Public Law 89-665, 16 U.S.C. section 470. The Department of Natural and Cultural Resources shall maintain a permanent file containing research reports, descriptions, photographs, and other appropriate documentation relating to properties deemed worthy of inclusion in the statewide survey.

Statewide Historic Preservation Plan. — The Department of Natural and Cultural Resources shall prepare and revise as needed a State plan for historic preservation, which plan, when approved by the North Carolina Historical Commission, shall constitute official State policy for the preservation, or the encouragement of the preservation, of important historic, architectural, archaeological, and other cultural properties in North Carolina.

Cooperation with Federal Government. — The Department of Natural and Cultural Resources and/or the Department of Administration may enter into and carry out contracts with the federal government or any agency thereof under which said government or agency grants financial or other assistance to the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources to further the purposes of this Chapter. Either of the Departments may agree to and comply with any reasonable conditions not inconsistent with State law which are imposed on such grants. Such grants or other assistance may be accepted from the federal government or an agency thereof and expended whether or not pursuant to a contract.

Cooperation with Local Governments. — The Department shall, within the limits of staff and available funds, cooperate with and assist counties, cities, municipalities, and other subdivisions of government, and, where appropriate, private individuals and organizations, in promoting historic preservation to the end that important properties which are not owned by the State may be preserved or encouraged to be preserved. Such cooperation and assistance may include but not be limited to reviewing historic preservation plans, evaluating historic properties, and providing technical, financial and professional assistance. The Department may further enter into and carry out contracts with local governments or their agencies and with any private party to further the purposes of this Article.

Continuing Programs. — The Department of Natural and Cultural Resources shall develop a continuing program of historical, architectural, archaeological, and cultural research and development to include surveys, excavation, salvage, preservation, scientific recording, interpretation, and publication of the State’s historical, architectural, archaeological, and cultural resources. A reasonable charge may be made for publications resulting therefrom and the income from such sales may be devoted to the work of the Department.

Abandoned Cemeteries. — The Department of Natural and Cultural Resources is authorized to take appropriate measures to record and permanently preserve information of significant historical genealogical or archaeological value when, in the opinion of the Department, any such information located within an abandoned cemetery is in imminent danger of loss or destruction because of the condition or circumstances of the cemetery. The Department may obtain access to any abandoned cemetery for the purpose of recording and preserving information of significant historical, genealogical or archaeological value pursuant to Chapter 15, Article 4A of the General Statutes: Provided, that prior to the requesting of the administrative warrant, the Department shall contact the affected landowners and request their consent for access to their lands for the purpose of gathering such information. If consent is not granted, the Department shall give reasonable notice of the time, place and before whom the administrative warrant will be requested so that the owner or owners may have an opportunity to be heard. Service of this notice may be in any manner prescribed by N.C.G.S. 1A-1 Rule 4(j). Any measures taken by the Department pursuant to this subsection shall be effected in such a manner as to cause as little inconvenience or disruption as possible to the owners of the land upon which the abandoned cemetery is located and of land necessary to obtain access to the cemetery.

History.

1973, c. 476, s. 48; 1981, c. 215; 1989, c. 65; 2002-159, s. 35(h); 2015-241, s. 14.30(s).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(s), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Department of Natural and Cultural Resources” for “Department of Cultural Resources” throughout the section.

Legal Periodicals.

For symposium on historic preservation which includes a discussion of relevant North Carolina law, see 12 Wake Forest L. Rev. 9 (1976).

For article discussing legal issues of historic preservation for local governments in North Carolina, see 17 Wake Forest L. Rev. 707 (1981).

§ 121-9.
Historic properties.

Administration of Properties Acquired by State. — Historic or archaeological properties acquired by the State for administration by the State of North Carolina shall be under the control and administration of the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources. Upon approval of the North Carolina Historical Commission and the Secretary of Natural and Cultural Resources, the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources may, in its discretion, make a contract with any county or municipality within the State or with any nonprofit corporation or organization for the administration of any portion of such property.

Acquisition of Historic Properties. — For the purpose of protecting or preserving any property of historical, architectural, archaeological, or other cultural importance to the people of North Carolina, and subject to the provisions of Subchapter II of Chapter 146 of the General Statutes, the Department may, with the approval of the North Carolina Historical Commission and after consultation with the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources and the Fiscal Research Division, acquire, preserve, restore, hold, maintain, operate, and dispose of such properties, together with such adjacent lands as may be necessary for their protection, preservation, maintenance, and operation. Such property may be real or personal in nature, and in the case of real property, the acquisition may include the fee or any lesser interest therein. Property may be acquired by gift, grant, devise, lease, purchase, or condemnation pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 40A of the General Statutes, or otherwise. Property may be acquired by the Department, using such funds as may be appropriated for the purpose or monies available to it from any other source.

(b1)

In the case of real property, the North Carolina Historical Commission shall report the following information to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources and the Fiscal Research Division before acquiring the property:

The statewide historical significance of the site.

The potential uses of the site.

The capital requirements of the site over a 20-year period of time.

The annual operating costs of the site.

The expected levels of visitation at the site.

Any other information that would assist in determining the full cost of maintaining, operating, and administering the site as State property.

Interests Which May Be Acquired. — In the case of real property, the interest acquired shall be limited to that estate, interest, or term deemed by the Department to be reasonably necessary for the continued protection or preservation of the property. The Department may acquire the fee simple title, but where it finds that a lesser interest, including any development right, negative or affirmative easement in gross or appurtenant, covenant, lease, or other contractual right of or to any real property to be the most practical and economical method of protecting and preserving historic property, the lesser interest may be acquired.

Conveyance of Property for Preservation Purposes. — In appropriate cases, the Department may acquire or dispose of the fee or lesser interest to any such property for the specific purpose of conveying or leasing the property back to its original owner or of conveying or leasing it to such other person, firm, association, corporation, or other organization under such covenants, deed restrictions, lease, or other contractual arrangements as will limit the future use of the property in such a way as to insure its preservation. Where such action is taken, the property may be conveyed or leased by private sale. In all cases where property is conveyed, it shall be subjected by covenant or otherwise to such rights of access, public visitation, and other conditions or restrictions of operation, maintenance, restoration, and repair as the Department may prescribe, or to such conditions as may be agreed upon between the Department and the grantee or lessee to accomplish the purposes of this section.

Use of Property so Acquired. — Any historic property acquired, whether in fee or otherwise, may be used, maintained, improved, restored, or operated by the Department for any public purpose within its powers and not inconsistent with the purpose of the continued preservation of the property. The property shall not be subject to condemnation by the State of North Carolina or any of its agencies or political subdivisions at any time, unless such method of acquisition is first approved by the Governor and Council of State.

Emergency Acquisition Where Funds Not Immediately Available. — If funds or contributions for the acquisition of needed historic property are not available, the Governor and Council of State may, upon the recommendation of the Secretary of Natural and Cultural Resources and approval of the North Carolina Historical Commission, allocate from the Contingency and Emergency Fund an amount sufficient to acquire an option on the property or properties, which option shall continue until 90 days after the adjournment sine die of the next General Assembly. Upon recommendation of the Secretary and approval of the Historical Commission, the Governor and Council of State may allocate funds from the Contingency and Emergency Fund for the immediate acquisition, preservation, restoration, or operation of historically, archaeologically, architecturally, or culturally important properties. All funds hereinafter appropriated to purchase, restore, maintain, develop, or operate historic or archaeological or other important property shall be administered subject to the provisions of Chapter 143C and G.S. 143B-53.1 of the General Statutes unless the statute making the appropriation shall in specific and express terms provide otherwise.

Power to Acquire Property by Condemnation. — In the event that a property which has been found by the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources to be important for public ownership or assistance is in danger of being sold, used, or neglected to such an extent that its historical or cultural importance will be destroyed or seriously impaired, or that the property is otherwise in danger of destruction or serious impairment, the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources, after receiving the approval of the North Carolina Historical Commission and of the Governor and Council of State, may acquire the historic property or any interest therein by condemnation under the provisions of Chapter 40A of the General Statutes. The Department of Natural and Cultural Resources, upon finding that destruction or serious impairment of the value of the property is imminent, shall file with the Governor and Council of State a report on the importance of the property and the desirability of ownership of the property, or the ownership of an interest therein, by the State of North Carolina. Upon giving their approval, the Governor and Council of State shall cause to have filed such approval with the clerk of the superior court in the county or counties where the property is situated. Until the approval is filed, the power of condemnation may not be exercised. All condemnation proceedings shall be instituted and prosecuted in the name of the State of North Carolina.

Preservation and Custodial Care of State Capitol. — The rotunda, corridors, and stairways of the first floor of the State Capitol and all portions of the second, third, and loft floors of the said building shall be placed in the custody of the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources; and the Department shall, subject to the availability of funds for the purpose, care for and administer these areas for the edification of present and future generations. The aforesaid areas shall be preserved as historic shrines and shall be maintained insofar as practicable as they shall appear following the restoration of the Capitol. The Department of Natural and Cultural Resources is authorized to deny the use of the legislative chambers for meetings in order that they, with their historic furnishings, may be better preserved for posterity; provided, however, that the General Assembly may hold therein such sessions as it may by resolution deem proper.The Department of Natural and Cultural Resources is hereby entrusted with the responsibilities herein specified as being the agency with the experience best qualified to preserve and administer historic properties in a suitable manner. However, for the purposes of carrying out the provisions of this section, it is hereby directed that such cooperation and assistance shall be made available to the said Department of Natural and Cultural Resources and such labor supplied, as may be feasible, by the Department of Administration.The offices and working areas of the first floor as well as all washrooms and the exterior of the Capitol shall remain under the jurisdiction of the Department of Administration: Provided, however, that the Department of Administration shall seek the advice of the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources in matters relating to any alteration, renovation, and furnishing of said offices and areas.

History.

1955, c. 543, s. 1; 1961, c. 724; 1963, c. 210, s. 1; 1965, c. 1129; 1971, c. 480, ss. 1-3, 5; 1973, c. 476, s. 48; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1030, s. 34; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 682, s. 2; 1995, c. 507, s. 12(b); 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, s. 7.7(a); 2006-203, s. 64; 2011-284, s. 87; 2015-241, s. 14.30(s), (t); 2017-57, s. 14.1(cc).

§ 121-9.1.
Lake Mattamuskeet Lodge Preservation.

Notwithstanding

G.S. 121-9

, the State of North Carolina accepts the transfer of the Mattamuskeet Lodge and surrounding property to the State under the Lake Mattamuskeet Lodge Preservation Act, P.L. 109-358. The property shall be transferred to and managed by the Wildlife Resources Commission.

Repealed by Session Laws 2016-94, s. 14.14(b), effective July 1, 2016.

History.

2007-13, ss. 1, 2; 2015-241, s. 14.30(s); 2016-94, s. 14.14(b).

§ 121-10.
Security of historic properties.

Designated Employees Commissioned Special Peace Officers by Governor. — Upon application by the Secretary of Natural and Cultural Resources, the Governor is hereby authorized and empowered to commission as special peace officers such employees of the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources as the Secretary may designate for the purpose of enforcing the laws, rules, and regulations enacted or adopted for the protection, preservation and government of State historic or archaeological properties under the control or supervision of the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources. Such employees shall receive no additional compensation for performing the duties of special peace officers under this section.

Powers of Arrest. — Any employee of the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources commissioned as a special peace officer shall have the right to arrest with warrant any person violating any law, rule, or regulation on or relating to the State historic or archaeological properties under the control or supervision of the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources, and shall have power to pursue and arrest without warrant any person violating in his presence any law, rule, or regulation on or relating to said historic and archaeological properties under the control or supervision of the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources.

Bond Required. — Each employee of the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources commissioned as a special peace officer under this section shall give a bond with a good surety, payable to the State of North Carolina in a sum not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000), conditioned upon the faithful discharge of his duty as such peace officer. The bond shall be duly approved by and filed in the office of the Commissioner of Insurance, and copies of the same, certified by the Commissioner of Insurance, shall be received in evidence in all actions and proceedings in this State.

Oaths Required. — Before any employee of the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources commissioned as a special peace officer shall exercise any power of arrest under this Article, he shall take the oaths required of public officers before an officer authorized to administer oaths.

History.

1955, c. 543, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 48; 2015-241, s. 14.30(s), (t).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(s), (t), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Department of Natural and Cultural Resources” for “Department of Cultural Resources” wherever it appears; and substituted “Secretary of Natural and Cultural Resources” for “Secretary of Cultural Resources” in subsection (a).

§ 121-11.
Procedures where assistance extended to cities, counties, and other agencies or individuals.

In consideration of the public purpose thereby achieved, the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources may assist any county, city, or other political subdivision, corporation or organization, or private individual in the acquisition, maintenance, preservation, restoration, or development of historic or archaeological property by providing a portion of the cost therefor: Provided, that the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources may not make any acquisition, maintenance, preservation, restoration, or development of any property, nor any assistance for any property, nor any contribution for these purposes, until:

The property or properties shall have been approved for these purposes by the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources according to criteria adopted by the North Carolina Historical Commission,

The report and recommendations of the Commission have been received and considered by the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources, and

The Department has found that there is a feasible and practical method of providing funds for the acquisition, restoration, preservation, maintenance, and operation of such property.

In all cases where assistance is extended by the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources to nonstate owners of property, whether from State funds or otherwise, it shall be a condition of assistance that

(1)

The property assisted shall, upon its acquisition or restoration, be made accessible to the public at such times and upon such terms as the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources shall by rule prescribe;

(2)

That the plans for preservation, restoration, and development be reviewed and approved by the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources;

(3)

That the expenditure of such funds be supervised by the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources; and

That such expenditures be accounted to the Department in a manner and at such times as are satisfactory to it.

In further consideration of the public purpose thereby achieved, the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources may assist any county, city, or other political subdivision, or corporation nonprofit history museum in the development of interpretive, security or climate control programs or projects. Provided, that the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources may not make any assistance or contribution from State funds for a program or project until:

(1)

The program or project shall have been approved for these purposes by the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources according to criteria adopted by the North Carolina Historical Commission;

(2)

The report and recommendations of the Commission have been received and considered by the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources; and

(3)

The Department has found that there is a feasible and practical method of providing funds for the maintenance and operation of such history museum.

In all cases where assistance is extended by the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources to nonstate owners of history museums, whether from State funds or otherwise, it shall be a condition of assistance that:

(1)

The museum assisted shall be accessible to the public at such times and upon such terms as the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources shall by rule prescribe;

(2)

Plans for the development of museum programs or projects be reviewed and approved by the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources;

(3)

The expenditure of such funds be supervised by the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources; and

(4)

Such expenditures be accounted to the Department in a manner and at such times as are satisfactory to it.

History.

1973, c. 476, s. 48; 1979, c. 861, s. 2; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1014, s. 171(a); 2015-241, s. 14.30(s).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(s), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Department of Natural and Cultural Resources” for “Department of Cultural Resources” throughout the section.

Legal Periodicals.

For symposium on historic preservation which includes a discussion of relevant North Carolina law, see 12 Wake Forest L. Rev. 9 (1976).

§ 121-12.
North Carolina Historical Commission.

Protection of Properties on National Register. — It shall be the duty of the Historical Commission, meeting at such times and according to such procedures as it shall by rule prescribe, to provide an advisory and coordinative mechanism in and by which State undertakings of every kind that are potentially harmful to the cause of historic preservation within the State may be discussed, and where possible, resolved, giving due consideration to the competing public interests that may be involved. To this end, the head of any State agency having direct or indirect jurisdiction over a proposed State or state-assisted undertaking, or the head of any State department, board, commission, or independent agency having authority to build, construct, operate, license, authorize, assist, or approve any State or state-assisted undertaking, shall, prior to the approval of any State funds for the undertaking, or prior to any approval, license, or authorization, as the case may be, take into account the effect of the undertaking on any district, site, building, structure, or object that is listed in the National Register of Historic Places established pursuant to Public Law 89-665, 16 U.S.C. 470.Where, in the judgment of the Commission, an undertaking will have an effect upon any listed district, site, building, structure, area, or object, the head of the appropriate State agency shall afford the Commission a reasonable opportunity to comment with regard to such undertaking.The Historical Commission shall act with reasonable diligence to insure that all State departments, boards, commissions, or agencies potentially affected by the provisions of this section be kept currently informed with respect to the name, location, and other significant particulars of any district, site, building, structure, or object listed or placed upon the National Register of Historic Places. Each affected State department or agency shall furnish, either upon its own initiative or at the request of the Historical Commission such information as may reasonably be required by the Commission for the proper implementation of this section.

Criteria for State Historic Properties. — The Commission shall prepare and adopt criteria for the evaluation of State historic sites and all other real and personal property which it may consider to be of such historic, architectural, archaeological, or cultural importance as would justify the acquisition and ownership thereof by the State of North Carolina, or for the extension of any assistance or aid thereto by the State, acting by itself or in connection with any county, city, corporation, organization, or individual. The Commission shall cooperate to the fullest practical extent with any local historical organization and with any city or county historic district properties commission. In evaluating whether a building should be a State historic site, the Commission shall request and review plans for the use and maintenance of the building.

Criteria for State Aid to Historic Properties. — The Commission shall also prepare and adopt criteria for the evaluation of all properties of historic or archaeological importance owned by, under option to, or being considered for acquisition by a county, city, historic properties commission, or other organization or individual for which State aid or assistance is requested from the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources. The Commission shall investigate, evaluate, and prepare a written report on all historic or archaeological property for which State aid or appropriations to be administered by the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources are proposed. If the property is a building, the Commission shall request and review the plans for the use, maintenance, operation, and purpose of the building and shall comment on the feasibility of the plans in the written report. This report, which shall be filed as a matter of record in the custody of the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources, shall set forth the following opinions or recommendations of the Commission:

Whether the property is historically authentic;

Whether it is of such educational, historical, or cultural significance as to be essential to the development of a balanced State program of historic and archaeological sites and properties;

The estimated total cost of the project under consideration and the apportionment of said cost among State and nonstate sources;

Whether practical plans have been or can be developed for the funding of the nonstate portion of the costs;

Whether practical plans have been developed for the continued staffing, maintenance and operation of the property without State assistance; and

Such further comments and recommendations that the Commission may make.

(c1)

Criteria for State Aid to Historical Museums. —

The Commission shall also prepare and adopt criteria for the evaluation of all interpretive, security or climate control programs or projects to be installed in nonprofit history museums for which State aid or assistance is requested from the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources. The Commission shall investigate, evaluate, and prepare a written report on all interpretive, security, or climate control programs or projects for which State appropriations to be administered by the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources are proposed. This report, which shall be filed as a matter of record in the custody of the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources, shall set forth the following opinions or recommendations of the Commission:

(1)

The statewide educational significance and the qualitative level of the program or project and whether the program or project is essential to the development of a State program of historical interpretation;

(2)

The local or regional need for such a program or project;

(3)

The estimated total cost of the program or project under consideration and the apportionment of said cost among State and nonstate sources;

(4)

Whether practical plans have been or can be developed for the funding of the nonstate portions of the costs;

(5)

Whether practical plans have been developed for the continued staffing, maintenance, and operating of the museum without State assistance; and

(6)

Such further comments and recommendations that the Commission may make.

Commission to Furnish Recommendations to Legislative Committees. — The Commission through the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources shall furnish as soon as practicable to the chairman of each legislative committee to which is referred any bill seeking an appropriation of State funds to the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources for the purpose of acquiring, preserving, restoring, or operating, or otherwise assisting, any property having historic, archaeological, architectural, or other cultural value or significance, and to the chairman of each legislative committee to which is referred any bill seeking an appropriation of State funds to the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources for the purpose of assisting a history museum, at least five copies of a report on the findings and recommendations of the Commission relating to such property.

History.

1973, c. 476, s. 48; 1975, c. 19, s. 40; 1979, c. 861, ss. 3-5; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1014, s. 171(b); 1995, c. 324, s. 12; 2015-241, s. 14.30(s).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(s), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Department of Natural and Cultural Resources” for “Department of Cultural Resources” in subsection (c), the introductory paragraph of subsection (c1) and subsection (d).

Legal Periodicals.

For symposium on historic preservation which includes a discussion of relevant North Carolina law, see 12 Wake Forest L. Rev. 9 (1976).

For article, “A Decade of Preservation and Preservation Law,” see 11 N.C. Cent. L.J. 214 (1980).

§ 121-12.1.
Grants-in-aid.

Under the concepts of reorganization of State government, responsibility for administering appropriations to the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources for grants-in-aid to private nonprofit organizations in the areas of history, art, and culture is assigned to the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources. By February 15 of each year, the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources shall receive, analyze, and recommend to the Governor, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources, and the Fiscal Research Division the disposition of any request for funding received by it from or for any of these organizations. The Department shall disburse under provisions of law any appropriations made to the Department for them. Appropriations to the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources for grants-in-aid to assist in the restoration of historic sites owned by private nonprofit organizations shall be expended only in accordance with

G.S. 121-11

, 121-12 and 143B-53.1.

History.

1977, c. 802, s. 47; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 955, s. 40; c. 1014, s. 171(c); 2006-203, s. 65; 2015-241, s. 14.30(s); 2017-57, s. 14.1(dd), (ee).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-203, s. 65, effective July 1, 2007, and applicable to the budget for the 2007-2009 biennium and each subsequent biennium thereafter, in the second sentence, deleted “, the Advisory Budget Commission,” following “Governor”, and substituted “143B-53.1” for “143-31.2” at the end; and deleted the former last sentence, which read: “The function of the Advisory Budget Commission under this section applies only if the Director of the Budget consults with the Commission in preparation of the budget.”

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(s), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Department of Natural and Cultural Resources” for “Department of Cultural Resources” throughout.

Session Laws 2017-57, s. 14.1(dd), effective July 1, 2017, substituted “Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources” for “Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations” in the second sentence.

Session Laws 2017-57, s. 14.1(ee), effective July 1, 2017, deleted “hereby” preceding “assigned” in the first sentence; rewrote the second sentence; added the third sentence; and deleted “in addition” preceding “be expended” in the last sentence.

§ 121-12.2.
Procedures for preparing budget requests and expending appropriations for grants-in-aid.

Requests for funding may be submitted by these organizations to the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources. If received by any other department of State government except the General Assembly they shall be forwarded to the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources. All such requests shall be subjected to the process described in

G.S. 121-12.1

and included in the Department’s biennial budget request submitted in compliance with the Executive Budget Act.

The Department of Natural and Cultural Resources shall notify on a timely basis and in appropriate detail all those recipients of continuing appropriations as grants-in-aid of the requirements for submission of requests for appropriations for the ensuing fiscal period.

The Secretary of Natural and Cultural Resources is empowered and directed, in discharging the responsibilities herein assigned, to make regular and timely reviews, studies and recommendations concerning the operations and needs of these organizations for State funds, and to request from the applicants for grants and the recipients of grants through the Department, operating statements, audit reports and other information deemed appropriate.

History.

1977, c. 802, s. 47; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1014, s. 171(d); 2015-241, s. 14.30(s), (t).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(s), (t), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Department of Natural and Cultural Resources” for “Department of Cultural Resources” in the first and second paragraphs; and substituted “Secretary of Natural and Cultural Resources” for “Secretary of Cultural Resources” in the last paragraph.

§ 121-13.
Acquisition of portrait of Governor during term of office.

During the term of office of each Governor of this State and at least six months prior to its expiration, the Secretary of Natural and Cultural Resources is directed to select a skilled artist to paint a portrait of such Governor, and have the same suitably framed. Upon the painting and acquisition of such portrait, the same shall be placed in some appropriate building to be designated by the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources and which is located in the City of Raleigh.

The cost of the painting and acquisition of said portrait, including the cost of the frame and other necessary expenses incident thereto, shall be paid from the Contingency and Emergency Fund.

History.

1955, c. 1248; 1973, c. 476, s. 48; 2015-241, s. 14.30(s), (x).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(s), (x), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Department of Natural and Cultural Resources” for “Department of Cultural Resources” and “Secretary of Natural and Cultural Resources” for “Secretary of the Department of Cultural Resources” in the first paragraph.

§§ 121-13.1,
121-13.2.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 476, s. 48.